Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,113
Schedule of fees.

The commission may by rule and regulation provide for a schedule of fees related to the administration of applications, registrations, and renewals of registrations. No fee shall exceed fifty thousand dollars.

Laws 2026, LB1235, § 8.
April 8, 2026